Hawaii statutes.
§179D-2 Declaration of purpose. The
purpose of this chapter is to provide for the inspection and regulation of
construction, enlargement, repair, alteration, maintenance, operation, and
removal of all dams or reservoirs to protect the health, safety, and welfare of
the citizens of the State by reducing the risk of failure of the dams or
reservoirs. The legislature finds and declares that the inspection and
regulation of all dams or reservoirs are properly a matter of regulation under
the police powers of the State, unless specifically exempted.

The board shall have jurisdiction of all dams
and reservoirs until the department has completed its statewide inspections and
has established and implemented rules and criteria for a five year dams and
reservoirs inspection and classification processes and the board declares which
dams or reservoirs are to be removed from its jurisdiction. [L 1987, c 199, pt
of §1; am L 2007, c 262, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next